Massachusetts, session 194th, H713.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 76 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by adding the following section:-
Section 22. (a) A student who participates in an activity or program sponsored by
Massachusetts 4-H shall be credited as present, for a maximum of 5 school days, by the school in
which the student is enrolled in the same manner as an educational field trip. A school committee
shall not count a student absent, for a maximum of 5 school days, for participating in an activity
or program sponsored by Massachusetts 4-H.
of 2

(b) Upon request from a school committee, a Massachusetts 4-H agent shall provide
documentation as proof of a student's participation in an activity or program sponsored by
Massachusetts 4-H.
(c) A school committee shall ensure that a student has the opportunity to make up any
school work missed while the student was participating in an activity or program sponsored by
Massachusetts 4-H. A school committee shall ensure that a student's class grades are not
adversely affected for lack of attendance or participation due to the student's participation in an
activity or program sponsored by Massachusetts 4-H.
(d) Notwithstanding subsection (a), a school committee shall not credit a student who
participates in an activity or program sponsored by Massachusetts 4-H as present if the student's
participation occurs during:
(1) The schedule established by the commissioner of education for the administration of
the Massachusetts comprehensive assessment system tests; or
(2) Any period of time for which the student has been suspended or expelled, if the
student's suspension or expulsion would otherwise preclude the student from participating in an
educational field trip.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect as of the 2025-2026 academic year.
of 2